galician.aff
#-----------------------------------------
# iño
flag *h:                # "CAT=a_nc,N=s"         #iño
[^CGZI]O    > -O,IÑO      # "GR=dim"  		# fillo->filliño
C O         > -CO,QUIÑO   # "GR=dim"  		# porco->porquiño
Z O         > -ZO,CIÑO    # "GR=dim"  		# mazo->maciño
G O         > -O,UIÑO     # "GR=dim"  		# antigo->antiguiño
E           > -E,IÑO      # "GR=dim"  		# bigode->bigodiño
[^É][S]     > IÑO         # "GR=dim"  		# deus->deusiño
É S         > -ÉS,ESIÑO   # "GR=dim"  		# marqués->marquesiño
[IRUN]      > CIÑO        # "GR=dim"  		# can->canciños
Z           > -Z,CIÑO     # "GR=dim"  		# arroz->arrociño
Ó           > -Ó,OIÑO     # "GR=dim"  		# pó->poiño
É           > -É,EIÑO     # "GR=dim"  		# pé->peiño
Ú           > -Ú,UCIÑO    # "GR=dim"  		# baú->bauciño
L           > IÑO         # "GR=dim"  		# anel->aneliño

[^CGZI]O    > -O,IÑOS     # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# fillo->filliños
C O         > -CO,QUIÑOS  # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# porco->porquiños
Z O         > -ZO,CIÑOS   # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# mazo->maciños
G O         > -O,UIÑOS    # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# antigo->antiguiños
E           > -E,IÑOS     # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# bigode->bigodiños
[^É][S]     >  IÑOS       # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# deus->deusiños
É S         > -ÉS,ESIÑOS  # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# marqués->marquesiños
[IRUN]      >  CIÑOS      # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# can->canciños
Z           > -Z,CIÑOS    # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# arroz->arrociños
Ó           > -Ó,IÑOS     # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# pó->poiños
É           > -É,EIÑOS    # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# pé->peiños
Ú           > -Ú,UCIÑOS   # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# baú->bauciños
L           > IÑOS        # "N=p,GR=dim"     	# anel->aneliños

[^ZG]A      > -A,IÑA      # "GR=dim"  		# presa->presiña
C A         > -CA,QUIÑA   # "GR=dim"  		# vaca->vaquiña
Z A         > -ZA,CIÑA    # "GR=dim"  		# cabeza->cabeciña
G A         > -A,UIÑA     # "GR=dim"  		# carga->carguiña
Á           > -Á,AIÑA     # "GR=dim"  		# pá->paiña

[^ZG]A      > -A,IÑAS     # "N=p,GR=dim"  	# presa->presiñas
C A         > -CA,QUIÑAS  # "GR=dim"      	# vaca->vaquiñas
Z A         > -ZA,CIÑAS   # "N=p,GR=dim"  	# cabeza->cabeciñas
G A         > -A,UIÑAS    # "N=p,GR=dim"  	# carga->carguiñas
Á           > -Á,AIÑAS    # "N=p,GR=dim"  	# pá->paiñas

flag z:                               #iño
E           > -E,IÑO      # "GR=dim"  		# pobre->pobriño
O           > -O,IÑO      # "GR=dim"  		# limpo->limpiño
L           > IÑO         # "GR=dim"  		# coral->coraliño

E           > -E,IÑOS     # "GR=dim"  		# pobre->pobriños
O           > -O,IÑOS     # "GR=dim"  		# limpo->limpiños
L           > IÑOS        # "GR=dim"  		# coral->coraliños

E           > -E,IÑA      # "GR=dim"  		# pobre->pobriña
O           > -O,IÑA      # "GR=dim"  		# limpo->limpiño

E           >  -E,IÑAS    # "GR=dim"  		# pobre->pobriñas
O           >  -O,IÑAS    # "GR=dim"  		# limpo->limpiñas


#---------------------------------------
# ción
flag *c:                 # "CAT=v,T=inf"      # ción
[AE] R      > -R,CIÓN      # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # inalar->inalación
[^X] I R    > -R,CIÓN      # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # abolir->abolición
P O R       > -R,SICIÓN    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # expor->exposición

[AE] R      > -R,CIÓNS     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p"   # inalar->inalacións
[^X] I R    > -R,CIÓNS     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p"   # abolir->abolicións
P O R       > -R,SICIÓNS   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p"   # expor->exposicións

flag *C:                 # "CAT=v,T=inf" #ción
T A R       > -TAR,CIÓN    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # cantar->canción
C I O N A R > -ONAR,ÓN     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # adicionar->adición
A I R       > -IR,CCIÓN    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # atrair->atracción
U I R       > -IR,CIÓN     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # evoluir->evolución

T A R       > -TAR,CIÓNS   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p"   # cantar->cancións
C I O N A R > -ONAR,ÓNS    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p"   # adicionar->adicións
A I R       > -IR,CCIÓNS   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p"   # atrair->atraccións
U I R       > -IR,CIÓNS    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p"   # evoluir->evolucións

#---------------------------------------
# zón
flag *o:                   # "CAT=v,T=inf"      # zón
[AEI] R      > -R,ZÓN      # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # criar->criazón
O R          > -R,SIZÓN    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # interpor->interposizón

[AEI] R      > -R,ZÓNS     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # criar->criazóns
O R	     > -R,SIZÓNS   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s"   # interpor->interposizóns

#---------------------------------------
# mento
flag *M:                    # "CAT=v,T=inf"          #mento
[AI] R      > -R,MENTO     #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=s"    # acumular->acumulamento
E R         > -ER,IMENTO   #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=s"    # sofrer->sofrimento

[AI] R      > -R,MENTOS    #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=p"    # acumular->acumulamentos
E R         > -ER,IMENTOS  #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=p"    # sofrer->sofrimentos

#---------------------------------------
# nte
flag *n:                 # "CAT=v,T=inf"              #ente
[AE] R      > -R,NTE       # "CAT=adj,N=s"      # lavar->lavante
I R         > -IR,ENTE     # "CAT=adj,N=s"      # aderir->aderente
O R         > -R,NENTE     # "CAT=adj,N=s"      # opor->oponente

[AE] R      > -R,NTES      # "CAT=adj,N=p"      # lavar->lavantes
I R         > -IR,ENTES    # "CAT=adj,N=p"      # aderir->aderentes
O R         > -R,NENTES    # "CAT=adj,N=p"      # opor->oponentes

#---------------------------------------
# dor
flag *D:                   # "CAT=v,T=inf"        #dor
[AEI] R     > -R,DOR       # "CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s" # lavar->lavador
[AEI] R     > -R,DORA      # "CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=s" # lavar->lavadora
[AEI] R     > -R,DORES     # "CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=p" # lavar->lavadores
[AEI] R     > -R,DORAS     # "CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=p" # lavar->lavadoras

#---------------------------------------
# íbel, ábel           verb2adj
flag *v:                  # "CAT=v,T=inf"         #ável
A R         > -AR,ÁBEL    # "CAT=adj,N=s"  	    # lavar->lavábel
E R         > -ER,ÍBEL    # "CAT=adj,N=s"       # beber->bebíbel
I R         > -IR,ÍBEL    # "CAT=adj,N=s"       # ouvir->ouvíbel

A R         > -AR,ÁBEIS   # "CAT=adj,N=p"       # lavar->lavábeis
E R         > -ER,ÍBEIS   # "CAT=adj,N=p"       # beber->bebíbeis
I R         > -IR,ÍBEIS   # "CAT=adj,N=p"       # ouvir->ouvíbeis

#---------------------------------------
# dela
flag *x:                    # "CAT=v,T=inf"          # dela
[AI] R > -R,DELA          # "CAT=nc,G=F,N=S"	   # apalpar->apalpadela
[AI] R > -R,DELAS         # "CAT=nc,G=F,N=P"	   # apalpar->apalpadelas
E R    > -ER,IDELA        # "CAT=nc,G=F,N=S"	   # lamber->lambidela
E R    > -ER,IDELAS       # "CAT=nc,G=F,N=P"	   # lamber->labidelas

#----------------------------------------
# áncia, éncia
flag *e:				# "CAT=v, T=inf"		  # áncia, éncia
A R    > -AR, ÁNCIA		# "CAT=n, G=F, N=S"		# alternar->alternáncia
E R	   > -ER, ÉNCIA		# "CAT=n, G=F, N=S"		# absorver->absorvéncia
I R	   > -IR, ÉNCIA		# "CAT=n, G=F, N=S"		# afluir->afluéncia
A R    > -AR, ÁNCIAS	# "CAT=n, G=F, N=P"		# alternar->alternáncias
E R	   > -ER, ÉNCIAS	# "CAT=n, G=F, N=P"		# absorver->absorvéncias
I R	   > -IR, ÉNCIAS	# "CAT=n, G=F, N=P"		# afluir->afluéncias 

#----------------------------------------
# dura
flag *u:				# "CAT=v, T=inf"		  #dura
[A E I] R > -R,DURA		# "CAT=n, G=F, N=S"		# abocar->abocadura
[A E I] R > -R,DURAS	# "CAT=n, G=F, N=S"		# abocar->abocaduras

#----------------------------------------
# eira
flag *y: # "CAT=nc"            # eira
O > -O,EIRO   # "FSEM=eiro"     # marmelo->marmeleiro
O > -O,EIROS  # "FSEM=eiro"     # marmelo->marmeleiros
A > -A,EIRA   # "FSEM=eiro"     # banana->bananeira
A > -A,EIRAS  # "FSEM=eiro"     # banana->bananeiras

#----------------------------------------
# oso
flag *w: # "CAT=nc"           # oso
O > SO       # "FSEM=oso"     # engano->enganoso
O > SA       # "FSEM=oso"     # engano->enganosa
O > SOS      # "FSEM=oso"     # engano->enganosos
O > SAS      # "FSEM=oso"     # engano->enganosas
A > -A,OSO   # "FSEM=oso"     # leña->leñoso
A > -A,OSA   # "FSEM=oso"     # leña->leñosa
A > -A,OSOS  # "FSEM=oso"     # leña->leñosos
A > -A,OSAS  # "FSEM=oso"     # leña->leñosas



#---------------------------------------------
# Presente de indicativo e de subxuntivo dos verbos regulares e alguns semiregulares
